lexc/inoun.lexc
Multichar_Symbols @P.FORMAL.ON@ @D.FORMAL@ @C.FORMAL@ @R.FORMAL@ @P.VOWEL.HEH@ @P.VOWEL.YEH@ @P.VOWEL.ALEF@ @P.VOWEL.VAV@ @D.VOWEL.ALEF@ @D.VOWEL.YEH@ @D.VOWEL.VAV@ @D.VOWEL.HEH@ @D.VOWEL@ @C.VOWEL@ @R.VOWEL@ @R.VOWEL.ALEF@ @R.VOWEL.YEH@ @R.VOWEL.VAV@ @R.VOWEL.HEH@ @R.INFINITIVE@ @R.PASTPARTICIPLE@ @R.SPECINFL@ @P.INFINITIVE.ON@ @P.PASTPARTICIPLE.ON@ @P.SPECINFL.ON@ @P.VAR.ON@ @P.VA.ON@ @P.DAR.ON@ @P.BAR.ON@ @P.BAZ.ON@ @P.FARA.ON@ @R.VAR@ @R.VA@ @R.DAR@ @R.BAR@ @R.BAZ@ @R.FARA@ @P.VAY.ON@ @R.VAY@ @P.PA.ON@ @R.PA@ @D.PA@ @P.NEGAH.ON@ @R.NEGAH@ @P.VAR.ON@ @R.VAR@ @P.FORU.ON@ @R.FORU@ @D.PREP@ @P.PREP.ON@ @P.SING.ON@ @C.SING@ @D.SING@ @P.MOSULI.ON@ @D.MOSULI@ @P.MOBHAM.ON@ @D.MOBHAM@ @P.QPRO.ON@ @D.QPRO@

LEXICON Root
اسمعام=:0 ComNN;
صفت=:0 adjLex;
قید=:0 adv;
@P.INFINITIVE.ON@مصدر=:@P.INFINITIVE.ON@ pastStem;
@P.PASTPARTICIPLE.ON@صمفعولی=:@P.PASTPARTICIPLE.ON@ pastStem;
@P.SPECINFL.ON@@P.INFINITIVE.ON@منفی+مصدر=:@P.SPECINFL.ON@@P.INFINITIVE.ON@ن¤ pastStem;
@P.SPECINFL.ON@@P.PASTPARTICIPLE.ON@منفی+صمفعولی=:@P.SPECINFL.ON@@P.PASTPARTICIPLE.ON@ن¤ pastStem;
: chains;
شماره=: num;
@P.PREP.ON@حضاف=:@P.PREP.ON@ prep;
@P.PREP.ON@حضافگ=:@P.PREP.ON@ GPprep;
شخصی=: ppro;
@P.FORMAL.ON@مشترک=خود:@P.FORMAL.ON@خود shakhsi2;
!!!@P.FORMAL.ON@مشترک=خود:@P.FORMAL.ON@خود FINPOINT;
@P.MOBHAM.ON@مبهم=:@P.MOBHAM.ON@ mobhamLex;
اشاره=: esharelex;
@P.QPRO.ON@پرسش=:@P.QPRO.ON@ porseshi;
اسمجا=: locN;
اسمشخص=: persons;
اسمفامیل=: sname;
جملک=: sent;
شاخص=: spec;
: morphem;

LEXICON morphem
@P.FORMAL.ON@را FINPOINT;
را:رو FINPOINT;
را:و FINPOINT;
هم:م FINPOINT;

LEXICON specpathFRM
@P.FORMAL.ON@:@P.FORMAL.ON@ specpath;

!LEXICON specpath
!: ra2;
!: FINPOINT;

LEXICON snamepath
@P.FORMAL.ON@:@P.FORMAL.ON@ NNpostpl;

LEXICON perpathFRM
@P.FORMAL.ON@:@P.FORMAL.ON@ perpath;

LEXICON perpath
: NNpostpl;

LEXICON locFRM
@P.FORMAL.ON@:@P.FORMAL.ON@ loc;

LEXICON loc
: NNpostpl;

LEXICON porseshipl
@D.VOWEL@@C.SING@@P.VOWEL.ALEF@+جها:@D.VOWEL@@C.SING@@P.VOWEL.ALEF@×ها esharepostpl;
@D.VOWEL@@C.SING@@C.FORMAL@@P.VOWEL.ALEF@+جا:@D.VOWEL@@C.SING@@C.FORMAL@@P.VOWEL.ALEF@*ا esharepostpl;
@R.VOWEL.HEH@@C.SING@@C.VOWEL@@P.VOWEL.ALEF@+جها:@R.VOWEL.HEH@@C.SING@@C.VOWEL@@P.VOWEL.ALEF@×ها esharepostpl;
@R.VOWEL.YEH@@C.SING@@C.VOWEL@@P.VOWEL.ALEF@+جها:@R.VOWEL.YEH@@C.SING@@C.VOWEL@@P.VOWEL.ALEF@×ها esharepostpl;
@R.VOWEL.VAV@@C.SING@@C.VOWEL@@P.VOWEL.ALEF@+جها:@R.VOWEL.VAV@@C.SING@@C.VOWEL@@P.VOWEL.ALEF@*ها esharepostpl;
@R.VOWEL.ALEF@@C.SING@+جها:@R.VOWEL.ALEF@@C.SING@×ها esharepostpl;
@R.VOWEL.HEH@@C.SING@@C.VOWEL@@C.FORMAL@@P.VOWEL.ALEF@+جا:@R.VOWEL.HEH@@C.SING@@C.VOWEL@@C.FORMAL@@P.VOWEL.ALEF@*ا esharepostpl;
@R.VOWEL.YEH@@C.SING@@C.VOWEL@@C.FORMAL@@P.VOWEL.ALEF@+جا:@R.VOWEL.YEH@@C.SING@@C.VOWEL@@C.FORMAL@@P.VOWEL.ALEF@*ا esharepostpl;
@R.VOWEL.VAV@@C.SING@@C.VOWEL@@C.FORMAL@@P.VOWEL.ALEF@+جا:@R.VOWEL.VAV@@C.SING@@C.VOWEL@@C.FORMAL@@P.VOWEL.ALEF@*ا esharepostpl;
0:0 esharepostpl;

LEXICON porseshipostpl
: shakhsi2;
: rabti1;
: ra1;
@D.VOWEL@@P.VOWEL.YEH@+نکره:@D.VOWEL@@P.VOWEL.YEH@*ی rabti1;
@R.VOWEL.ALEF@@C.VOWEL@@P.VOWEL.YEH@+نکره:@R.VOWEL.ALEF@@C.VOWEL@@P.VOWEL.YEH@*یی rabti1;
@R.VOWEL.ALEF@@C.VOWEL@@P.VOWEL.YEH@+نکره:@R.VOWEL.ALEF@@C.VOWEL@@P.VOWEL.YEH@*ئی rabti1;
@R.VOWEL.ALEF@@C.VOWEL@@P.VOWEL.YEH@+نکره:@R.VOWEL.ALEF@@C.VOWEL@@P.VOWEL.YEH@*عی rabti1;
@R.VOWEL.VAV@@C.VOWEL@@P.VOWEL.YEH@+نکره:@R.VOWEL.VAV@@C.VOWEL@@P.VOWEL.YEH@*یی rabti1;
@R.VOWEL.VAV@@C.VOWEL@@P.VOWEL.YEH@+نکره:@R.VOWEL.VAV@@C.VOWEL@@P.VOWEL.YEH@*ئی rabti1;
@R.VOWEL.VAV@@C.VOWEL@@P.VOWEL.YEH@+نکره:@R.VOWEL.VAV@@C.VOWEL@@P.VOWEL.YEH@*عی rabti1;
@R.VOWEL.HEH@@C.VOWEL@@P.VOWEL.YEH@+نکره:@R.VOWEL.HEH@@C.VOWEL@@P.VOWEL.YEH@×ای rabti1;
@R.VOWEL.HEH@@C.VOWEL@@P.VOWEL.YEH@+نکره:@R.VOWEL.HEH@@C.VOWEL@@P.VOWEL.YEH@×ئی rabti1;
@R.VOWEL.HEH@@C.VOWEL@@P.VOWEL.YEH@+نکره:@R.VOWEL.HEH@@C.VOWEL@@P.VOWEL.YEH@×عی rabti1;
@R.VOWEL.YEH@+نکره:@R.VOWEL.YEH@×ای rabti1;
@R.VOWEL.YEH@+نکره:@R.VOWEL.YEH@*ی rabti1;

LEXICON porseshiAlt
+وربطی۱:*شم FINPOINT;
+وربطی۲:*شی FINPOINT;
@P.FORMAL.ON@+وربطی۳:@P.FORMAL.ON@0 FINPOINT;
+وربطی۳:*ش FINPOINT;
+وربطی۳:*شش FINPOINT;
+وربطی۴:*شیم FINPOINT;
+وربطی۵:*شید FINPOINT;
+وربطی۵:*شین FINPOINT;
+وربطی۶:*شند FINPOINT;
+وربطی۶:*شن FINPOINT;

LEXICON eshareplFRM
@P.FORMAL.ON@:@P.FORMAL.ON@ esharepl;

LEXICON esharepl
@D.VOWEL@@C.SING@@P.VOWEL.ALEF@+جها:@D.VOWEL@@C.SING@@P.VOWEL.ALEF@×ها esharepostpl;
@D.VOWEL@@C.SING@@C.FORMAL@@P.VOWEL.ALEF@+جا:@D.VOWEL@@C.SING@@C.FORMAL@@P.VOWEL.ALEF@*ا esharepostpl;
@R.VOWEL.HEH@@C.SING@@C.VOWEL@@P.VOWEL.ALEF@+جها:@R.VOWEL.HEH@@C.SING@@C.VOWEL@@P.VOWEL.ALEF@×ها esharepostpl;
@R.VOWEL.YEH@@C.SING@@C.VOWEL@@P.VOWEL.ALEF@+جها:@R.VOWEL.YEH@@C.SING@@C.VOWEL@@P.VOWEL.ALEF@×ها esharepostpl;
@R.VOWEL.VAV@@C.SING@@C.VOWEL@@P.VOWEL.ALEF@+جها:@R.VOWEL.VAV@@C.SING@@C.VOWEL@@P.VOWEL.ALEF@*ها esharepostpl;
@R.VOWEL.ALEF@@C.SING@+جها:@R.VOWEL.ALEF@@C.SING@×ها esharepostpl;
@R.VOWEL.HEH@@C.SING@@C.VOWEL@@C.FORMAL@@P.VOWEL.ALEF@+جا:@R.VOWEL.HEH@@C.SING@@C.VOWEL@@C.FORMAL@@P.VOWEL.ALEF@*ا esharepostpl;
@R.VOWEL.YEH@@C.SING@@C.VOWEL@@C.FORMAL@@P.VOWEL.ALEF@+جا:@R.VOWEL.YEH@@C.SING@@C.VOWEL@@C.FORMAL@@P.VOWEL.ALEF@*ا esharepostpl;
@R.VOWEL.VAV@@C.SING@@C.VOWEL@@C.FORMAL@@P.VOWEL.ALEF@+جا:@R.VOWEL.VAV@@C.SING@@C.VOWEL@@C.FORMAL@@P.VOWEL.ALEF@*ا esharepostpl;
0:0 esharepostpl;
@R.VOWEL.YEH@@C.SING@@C.VOWEL@+جان:@R.VOWEL.YEH@@C.SING@@C.VOWEL@*ان esharepostpl;
@R.VOWEL.VAV@@C.SING@@C.VOWEL@+جان:@R.VOWEL.VAV@@C.SING@@C.VOWEL@*ان esharepostpl;
@R.VOWEL.ALEF@@C.SING@@C.VOWEL@+جان:@R.VOWEL.ALEF@@C.SING@@C.VOWEL@*یان esharepostpl;
@R.VOWEL.HEH@@C.SING@@C.VOWEL@+جان:@R.VOWEL.HEH@@C.SING@@C.VOWEL@×ان esharepostpl;
@D.VOWEL@@C.SING@@C.VOWEL@+جان:@D.VOWEL@@C.SING@@C.VOWEL@*ان esharepostpl;

LEXICON esharepostpl
: shakhsi2;
: nam;
@C.FORMAL@:@C.FORMAL@ mosuli;
@C.FORMAL@:@C.FORMAL@ nakare;
@C.FORMAL@:@C.FORMAL@ ra1;
: rabti3;
@D.VOWEL.HEH@@C.FORMAL@+عطف:@D.VOWEL.HEH@@C.FORMAL@*و FINPOINT;
@R.VOWEL.HEH@@C.FORMAL@+عطف:@R.VOWEL.HEH@@C.FORMAL@×و FINPOINT;

LEXICON esharealt
: rabti3;
@C.FORMAL@:@C.FORMAL@ ham1;

LEXICON postmobhamFRM
@P.FORMAL.ON@:@P.FORMAL.ON@ postmobham;

LEXICON postmobham
: shakhsi2;
: mosuli;
: other;

LEXICON postpproFRM
@P.FORMAL.ON@:@P.FORMAL.ON@ postppro;

LEXICON postppro
!!!!!!final vowel aware
@D.VOWEL@+موصولی:@D.VOWEL@*ی postmosuliPro;
@R.VOWEL.ALEF@@C.VOWEL@+موصولی:@R.VOWEL.ALEF@@C.VOWEL@*یی postmosuliPro;
@R.VOWEL.ALEF@@C.VOWEL@+موصولی:@R.VOWEL.ALEF@@C.VOWEL@*ئی postmosuliPro;
@R.VOWEL.ALEF@@C.VOWEL@+موصولی:@R.VOWEL.ALEF@@C.VOWEL@*عی postmosuliPro;
@R.VOWEL.VAV@@C.VOWEL@+موصولی:@R.VOWEL.VAV@@C.VOWEL@*یی postmosuliPro;
@R.VOWEL.VAV@@C.VOWEL@+موصولی:@R.VOWEL.VAV@@C.VOWEL@*ئی postmosuliPro;
@R.VOWEL.VAV@@C.VOWEL@+موصولی:@R.VOWEL.VAV@@C.VOWEL@*عی postmosuliPro;
@R.VOWEL.HEH@@C.VOWEL@+موصولی:@R.VOWEL.HEH@@C.VOWEL@×ای postmosuliPro;
@R.VOWEL.HEH@@C.VOWEL@+موصولی:@R.VOWEL.HEH@@C.VOWEL@×ئی postmosuliPro;
@R.VOWEL.HEH@@C.VOWEL@+موصولی:@R.VOWEL.HEH@@C.VOWEL@×عی postmosuliPro;
@R.VOWEL.YEH@+موصولی:@R.VOWEL.YEH@×ای postmosuliPro;
@R.VOWEL.YEH@+موصولی:@R.VOWEL.YEH@*ی postmosuliPro;
: other;

LEXICON postmosuliPro
@P.MOSULI.ON@@C.FORMAL@:@P.MOSULI.ON@@C.FORMAL@ ra1;
: rabti1;

LEXICON prepHubFRM
@P.FORMAL.ON@:@P.FORMAL.ON@ prepHub;

LEXICON finpointFRM
@P.FORMAL.ON@:@P.FORMAL.ON@ FINPOINT;

LEXICON prepHub
: shakhsi2;
: FINPOINT;

LEXICON numtailFRM
@P.FORMAL.ON@:@P.FORMAL.ON@ numtail;

LEXICON numtail
+ترتیبی:*م numtail2;
: consnHaComNN;
+تا:×تا consnHaComNN;

LEXICON numtail2
!!!:*ی consnHaComNN;
:*ین consnHaComNN;
: consnHaComNN;

LEXICON chains
@P.VAR.ON@ور+:@P.VAR.ON@ور* iChainVHub;
@P.VA.ON@وا+:@P.VA.ON@وا* iChainVHub;
@P.DAR.ON@در+:@P.DAR.ON@در* iChainVHub;
@P.BAR.ON@بر+:@P.BAR.ON@بر* iChainVHub;
@P.BAZ.ON@باز+:@P.BAZ.ON@باز* iChainVHub;
@P.FARA.ON@فرا+:@P.FARA.ON@فرا^ iChainVHub;!!!!corpus
@P.VAY.ON@وای+:@P.VAY.ON@وای* iChainVHub;!!!!corpus
@P.VAY.ON@وا+:@P.VAY.ON@وا* iChainVHub;!!!!corpus
@P.PA.ON@پا+:@P.PA.ON@پا* iChainVHub;!!!!corpus-only-formal-imperative
@P.NEGAH.ON@نگه+:@P.NEGAH.ON@نگه^ iChainVHub;
@P.FORU.ON@فرو+:@P.FORU.ON@فرو^ iChainVHub; !!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!newnew

LEXICON num
چار numtail;!!!!
چاهار numtail;!!
شیش numtail;
پونزده numtail;
شونزده numtail;
هوده numtail;
هیوده numtail;
هیجده numtail;
هیژده numtail;
دیویست numtail;
چارصد numtail;
پونصد numtail;
شیشصد numtail;
ملیارد numtail;
ترلیون numtail;
دو numtailFRM;
چهار numtailFRM;
پنج numtailFRM;
شش numtailFRM;
هفت numtailFRM;
هشت numtailFRM;
نه numtailFRM;
ده numtailFRM;
یازده numtailFRM;
دوازده numtailFRM;
سیزده numtailFRM;
چهارده numtailFRM;
پانزده numtailFRM;
شانزده numtailFRM;
هفده numtailFRM;
هجده numtailFRM;
نوزده numtailFRM;
بیست numtailFRM;
سی numtailFRM;
چهل numtailFRM;
پنجاه numtailFRM;
شصت numtailFRM;
هفتاد numtailFRM;
هشتاد numtailFRM;
نود numtailFRM;
صد numtailFRM;
دویست numtailFRM;
بیلیون numtailFRM;
سیصد numtailFRM;
چهارصد numtailFRM;
پانصد numtailFRM;
ششصد numtailFRM;
هفتصد numtailFRM;
هشتصد numtailFRM;
نهصد numtailFRM;
هزار numtailFRM;
میلیارد numtailFRM;
LEXICON GPprep
از‌دنبال prepHubFRM;
از‌جهت prepHubFRM;
از‌لحاظ prepHubFRM;
از‌پی prepHubFRM;
ازراه prepHubFRM;
از‌سر prepHubFRM;
از‌طریق prepHubFRM;
بعد‌از finpointFRM;
با‌کمک prepHubFRM;
بر‌علیه prepHubFRM;
بر‌اساس prepHubFRM;
بر‌مبنای prepHubFRM;
بر‌روی prepHubFRM;
بر‌طبق prepHubFRM;
بر‌خلاف prepHubFRM;
با‌وصف prepHubFRM;
به‌عکس prepHubFRM;
به‌علت prepHubFRM;
به‌استثنا‌ prepHubFRM;
به‌هنگام prepHubFRM;
بمحض prepHubFRM;
به‌مانند prepHubFRM;
به‌مثل prepHubFRM;
بموجب prepHubFRM;
به‌نحو prepHubFRM;
به‌پیش prepHubFRM;
به‌رغم prepHubFRM;
به‌صرف prepHubFRM;
به‌طرز finpointFRM;
به‌خلاف prepHubFRM;
در‌اطراف prepHubFRM;
در‌بین prepHubFRM;
در‌هنگام prepHubFRM;
در‌مقابل prepHubFRM;
درپی prepHubFRM;
در‌طی prepHubFRM;
در‌خصوص prepHubFRM;
مابه‌ازای prepHubFRM;
پس‌از finpointFRM;
تحت prepHubFRM;
LEXICON locN
تهرون loc;!!!!
ایرون loc;!!!!
اصفهون loc;!!!!
کرمون loc;!!!!
همدون loc;!!!!
افغانستان locFRM;
علی‌آباد locFRM;
آق‌داغ locFRM;
اصلاندوز locFRM;
بالاتجن locFRM;
بلژیک locFRM;
بروجن locFRM;
چراغ‌برق locFRM;
دهلی‌‌نو locFRM;
اصفهان locFRM;
فنلاند locFRM;
گچساران locFRM;
حبله‌رود locFRM;
هرزگوین locFRM;
جاجرم locFRM;
کلاچای locFRM;
کازرون locFRM;
کومس locFRM;
لوکزامبورگ locFRM;
مانیل locFRM;
مزار‌شریف locFRM;
ملاذگرد locFRM;
نقش‌رستم locFRM;
نصرت‌آباد locFRM;
پاریس locFRM;
غدیر‌‌خم locFRM;
قشم locFRM;
روتردام locFRM;
شهر‌‌ری locFRM;
سرپل‌ذهاب locFRM;
سیمان‌‌شهر locFRM;
سوربن locFRM;
تقی‌آباد locFRM;
تنب‌کوچک locFRM;
وین locFRM;
یافت‌آباد locFRM;
زاینده‌رود locFRM;
LEXICON persons
ممد perpath;
بیل perpath;
گیتس perpath;
باراک perpath;
عبدالله‌‌بن‌‌عباس perpathFRM;
عبدالرحمن perpathFRM;
ابراهام perpathFRM;
عبدالسلام perpathFRM;
آلفرد perpathFRM;
امین‌السلطان perpathFRM;
امرالله perpathFRM;
آرتور perpathFRM;
اعظم‌السادات perpathFRM;
بنی‌اسد perpathFRM;
بهروز perpathFRM;
بوالفرج perpathFRM;
دیه‌گو perpathFRM;
عماد perpathFRM;
عین‌‌الله perpathFRM;
فرزاد perpathFRM;
فیگارو perpathFRM;
گشتاسپ perpathFRM;
هارولد perpathFRM;
هیتلر perpathFRM;
ایوانوویچ perpathFRM;
جیمزباند perpathFRM;
کاووس perpathFRM;
کپنهاک perpathFRM;
ماهرخ perpathFRM;
مارگارت perpathFRM;
مقداد perpathFRM;
محمد‌باقر perpathFRM;
ملااسماعیل perpathFRM;
مولر perpathFRM;
نگار perpathFRM;
اوکتاو perpathFRM;
پریچهر perpathFRM;
قمربنی‌‌هاشم perpathFRM;
صدام perpathFRM;
ستار perpathFRM;
طارق‌‌عزیز perpathFRM;
خیرالنساء perpathFRM;
LEXICON sent
آه finpointFRM;
واویلا finpointFRM;
عجب finpointFRM;
وااسفا finpointFRM;
به‌چشم finpointFRM;
یاللعجب finpointFRM;
نه‌والله finpointFRM;
آهای finpointFRM;
آخه finpointFRM;!VOWEL_HEH
براوو finpointFRM;
اوا finpointFRM;!VOWEL_ALEF
جانمی finpointFRM;!VOWEL_YEH
مرحبا finpointFRM;!VOWEL_ALEF
سک‌سک finpointFRM;
واأسفا finpointFRM;!VOWEL_ALEF
زها‌زه finpointFRM;!VOWEL_HEH
عجل‌‌الله‌‌تعالی‌‌فرجه‌‌الشریف finpointFRM;
علیه‌‌السلام finpointFRM;
آمین‌یا‌رب‌العالمین finpointFRM;
از‌طرفی‌دیگر finpointFRM;
بشین‌و‌پاشو finpointFRM;
در‌این‌ارتباط finpointFRM;
امام‌الحرمین finpointFRM;
حجت‌الاسلام‌والمسلمین finpointFRM;
جاویدشاه finpointFRM;
نوش‌جان finpointFRM;
رب‌العالمین finpointFRM;
شب‌‌به‌‌خیر finpointFRM;
سلام‌الله‌علیه finpointFRM;
صلوات‌‌الله‌‌علیهم‌‌اجمعین finpointFRM;
سبحان‌الله finpointFRM;
خداحافظ finpointFRM;
خدای‌ناکرده finpointFRM;!VOWEL_HEH
زنده‌باد finpointFRM;
